Arkansas, session 2025, HB1916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-114-401, concerning definitions within
the Protecting Minors from Medical Malpractice Act of 2023, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) "Gender-affirming intervention" means an intervention to
support a patient's identification with the gender opposite of his or her
biological sex, including without limitation:
(A) Puberty blockers; and
(B) Cross-sex hormone therapy.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-114-402 and § 16-114-403 are amended to
read as follows:
16-114-402. Right of action.
(a) A healthcare professional who performs a gender transition
*JMB609*
04-02-2025 09:49:07 JMB609

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1916
procedure or a mental health professional who performs gender-affirming
intervention on a minor is liable to the minor if the minor is injured,
including without limitation any physical, psychological, emotional, or
physiological injury, by the gender transition procedure, gender-affirming
intervention, related treatment, or the after effects of the gender
transition procedure, or gender-affirming intervention, or related treatment.
(b)(1) A minor injured as provided under subsection (a) of this
section, or a representative of a minor injured as provided under subsection
(a) of this section who receives a gender transition procedure or a gender-
affirming intervention, including without limitation a parent or legal
guardian of a minor injured as provided under subsection (a) of this section
who receives a gender transition procedure or a gender-affirming intervention
acting on behalf of the minor, may bring a civil action against the
healthcare professional who performed the gender transition procedure or
gender-affirming intervention on the minor in a court of competent
jurisdiction for:
(A) Declaratory or injunctive relief;
(B) Compensatory damages;
(C) Punitive damages; and
(D) Attorney's fees and costs.
(2) A civil action under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be filed not later than fifteen (15) years after the date on which the
minor turns eighteen (18) years of age, or would have turned eighteen (18)
years of age if the minor died before turning eighteen (18) years of age.

16-114-403. Safe harbor.
(a) It is a defense to a civil action brought under § 16-114-402 that,
before performing a gender transition procedure or a gender-affirming
intervention on a minor:
(1) The healthcare professional documented the minor's perceived
gender or perceived sex for two (2) continuous years, and the minor's
perceived gender or perceived sex was invariably inconsistent with the
minor's biological sex throughout the two (2) years;
(2) To the extent that the minor suffered from a mental health
concern, at least two (2) healthcare professionals, including at least one
(1) mental health professional, certified in writing that the gender
04-02-2025 09:49:07 JMB609

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1916
transition procedure was the only way to treat the mental health concern;
(3) At least two (2) healthcare professionals, including at
least one (1) mental health professional, certified in writing that the minor
suffered from no other mental health concerns, including without limitation
depression, eating disorders, autism, attention deficit hyperactivity
disorder, intellectual disability, or psychotic disorders; and
(4) The healthcare professional received the voluntary and
informed consent of the parent or legal guardian of the minor and the minor
as provided in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Consent to a gender transition procedure or a gender-affirming
intervention is voluntary and informed only if, at least thirty (30) days
before the first treatment of the gender transition procedure or gender-
affirming intervention and during every subsequent medical visit for
treatment during the following six (6) months, the minor and the minor's
parent or legal guardian receive verbal notice and written notice in at least
14-point, proportionally spaced typeface that state the following facts,
verbatim:
“If your child begins one (1) of these treatments, it may
actually worsen the discordance and thus increase the likelihood that your
child will need additional and more serious interventions to address the
worsening condition. For example, if your child begins socially transitioning
or taking puberty blockers, that treatment may significantly increase the
likelihood that your child's discordance will worsen and lead to your child
eventually seeking cross-sex hormones or even surgery to remove some of your
child's body parts.
Sweden, Finland, and the United Kingdom have conducted systematic
reviews of evidence and concluded that there is no evidence that the
potential benefits of puberty blockers and cross-sex hormones for this
purpose outweigh the known or assumed risks.
Medical authorities in Sweden, Finland, and the United Kingdom
have since recommended psychotherapy as the first line of treatment for youth
gender dysphoria, with drugs and surgeries reserved as a measure of last
resort. Medical authorities in France have advised ‘great caution’ when
prescribing hormones for gender dysphoria.
There are people who underwent gender transition treatments or
gender-affirming interventions as minors and later regretted that decision
04-02-2025 09:49:07 JMB609

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1916
and the physical harm that these treatments caused, and the total percentage
of people who experience this regret is unknown. Some estimate that the rate
is below two percent (2%), but that estimate is based on studies done on
adults who transitioned as adults or on minors who transitioned under highly
restrictive and controlled conditions.
Sometimes gender transition treatments or gender-affirming
interventions have been proposed as a way to reduce the chances of a minor
committing suicide due to discordance between the minor's sex and his or her
perception, but the rates of actual suicide from this discordance remain
extremely low. Furthermore, as recognized by health authorities in Europe,
there is no evidence that suicidality is caused by ‘unaffirmed’ gender or
that gender transition treatments are causally linked to a reduction in
serious suicidal attempts or ideations.
For puberty blockers:
Puberty blockers are not approved for this purpose by the United
States Food and Drug Administration, which is the federal agency that
determines which drugs are safe and effective for humans to use. Claims about
puberty blockers' safety and efficacy are based on their use for precocious
puberty, a different condition in which normal puberty is allowed to resume
once the patient reaches the appropriate age. Studies on the benefits of
using puberty blockers for gender dysphoria are notoriously weak. Puberty
blockers are not fully reversible because, among other risks, puberty
blockers may intensify a minor's discordance and cause it to persist. Puberty
blockers increase the risk of your child being sterilized, meaning that he or
she will never be able to have children. Puberty blockers may also cause
diminished bone density for your child, increasing the risk of fracture and
early osteoporosis. Puberty blockers may also prevent your child from ever
being able to engage in sexual activity or achieve orgasm for the rest of
your child's life. There is no research on the long-term risks to minors of
persistent exposure to puberty blockers. The full effects of puberty blockers
on brain development and cognition are unknown.
For cross-sex hormones:
The use of cross-sex hormones in males is associated with
numerous health risks, such as thromboembolic disease, including without
limitation blood clots; cholelithiasis, including gallstones; coronary artery
disease, including without limitation heart attacks; macroprolactinoma, which
04-02-2025 09:49:07 JMB609

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1916
is a tumor of the pituitary gland; cerebrovascular disease, including without
limitation strokes; hypertriglyceridemia, which is an elevated level of
triglycerides in the blood; breast cancer; and irreversible infertility. The
use of cross-sex hormones in females is associated with risks of
erythrocytosis, which is an increase in red blood cells; severe liver
dysfunction; coronary artery disease, including without limitation heart
attacks; hypertension; and increased risk of breast and uterine cancers. Once
a minor begins cross-sex hormones, the minor may need to continue taking
those hormones for many years and possibly for the remainder of the minor's
life. The cost of these hormones may be tens of thousands of dollars. If the
use of cross-sex hormones leads to surgery, the total cost of transitioning
may exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
For surgical procedures:
The dangers, risks, complications, and long-term concerns
associated with these types of procedures are almost entirely unknown. There
are no long-term studies on either the effectiveness or safety of these
surgical procedures.”.

/s/Bentley

















04-02-2025 09:49:07 JMB609